Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1504.03
Grants or loans; restrictions.

No disbursements from grants or loans administered pursuant to the Environmental Protection Act shall be made for projects related to tire-derived fuel.

Laws 2001, LB 461, § 9.